District of Columbia statutes.
47-3721

Report by Mayor concerning amendment, repeal, or replacement of Internal Revenue Code of 1954.

Within 90 days after any amendment, repeal, or replacement of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, the Mayor shall report to the Council concerning the amendment, repeal, or replacement. The reports shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of the impact of conformity to the amendment, repeal, or replacement on District taxpayers, and on District of Columbia government revenues over the next 5-year period, and a recommendation as to whether any change in District law should be made as a result of the amendment, repeal, or replacement.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 22, 33 DCR 7008
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-3721.

Prior Codifications